Connecticut, session 2026, HB05157.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 22a-905i of the general statutes is amended by
2 adding subsection (s) as follows (Effective from passage):
3 (NEW) (s) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, not later
4 than July 1, 2027, each retailer shall join a tire stewardship organization.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 22a-905i(s)
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 1 of 1